Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1197.
do enact as follows:AB1197,13Section 1. 704.01 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1197,2,24704.01 (5) “Tenant at will” means any tenant holding with the permission of 5the tenant’s landlord without a valid lease and under circumstances not involving 1periodic payment of rent; but a person holding possession of real property under a 2contract of purchase or an employment contract is not a tenant under this chapter.AB1197,2,33